Missouri, session 2026, HB3023.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 650, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 650.920, to read as follows:
650.920. 1. There is hereby established within the department of public safety
the "Private Security Camera Incentive Program" to provide financial assistance to
qualified applicants who reside in priority areas of this state to improve their safety and
security through the purchase of security cameras to be installed on property owned or
leased by such applicants. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Department", the department of public safety;
(2) "Priority area", an area identified by the department of public safety as
needing additional security measures based on public safety indicators, including crime
levels;
(3) "Program", the private security camera incentive program established under
this section;
(4) "Qualified applicant", a person residing in a priority area who is sixty-five
years of age or older, disabled, or whose household income does not exceed one hundred
and fifty percent of the current federal poverty level or sixty percent of the state median
income;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3023 2
(5) "Security camera", an outdoor surveillance camera system, with functioning
digital video recording capability, that is installed on property owned or leased by a
qualified applicant.
2. Subject to appropriations, the department shall award rebates or vouchers to
qualified applicants beginning in January 2028. All rebates or vouchers shall be
awarded from the fund established under subsection 6 of this section. Rebates or
vouchers awarded shall be distributed by the law enforcement agency or fire
department with jurisdiction over the area in which the applicant resides.
3. Before January 1, 2027, the department shall establish the following:
(1) The methodology used to identify a priority area;
(2) The permissible collection, dissemination, use, and disposal of images
recorded by a security camera purchased under the program; and
(3) Minimum standards for security cameras purchased under the program.
4. An owner or lessee of a property may qualify to receive a rebate or voucher
under the program if:
(1) The applicant is sixty-five years of age or older, disabled, or the applicant's
household income does not exceed one hundred and fifty percent of the current federal
poverty level or sixty percent of the state median income;
(2) The property is located within a priority area;
(3) The applicant agrees in writing that the security camera will not be used for
the purpose of recording private property not owned or leased by the applicant;
(4) The rebate or voucher is used solely to offset the costs of a security camera;
(5) The application is submitted in the form and manner prescribed by the
department; and
(6) The security camera is purchased and installed after August 28, 2026.
5. The amount of a rebate or voucher under the program shall not exceed the
purchase cost of a security camera.
6. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Private Security Camera
Incentive Program Reimbursement Fund", which shall consist of moneys appropriated
to it by the general assembly and any gifts, donations, and bequests received from
federal, private, or other sources. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In
accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve
disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys
in this fund shall be used to provide rebates or vouchers to qualified applicants as
provided under this section.

HB 3023 3
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
7. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall sunset
six years after the effective date of this section unless reauthorized by an act of the
general assembly; and
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this
section is sunset.
8. The department may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔